Utah statutes.
17D-1-206.   Protests.

(1)  An interested person may protest:

(a)  the creation of a special service district; or

(b)  a service that the special service district is proposed to provide.

(2)  Each protest under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  be in writing;

(b)  be submitted:

(i)  to the legislative body of the county or municipality by which the special service district is proposed to be created; and

(ii)  no later than 60 days after the public hearing required under Subsection 17D-1-204(2); and

(c)  explain why the person is protesting.

(3)  A person who submitted a written protest against the creation of a special service district may withdraw the protest or, having withdrawn a protest, cancel the withdrawal, no later than 60 days after the public hearing required under Subsection 17D-1-204(2).

(4)  The legislative body of a county or municipality may not adopt a resolution or ordinance creating a special service district if adequate protests are filed with respect to the creation of the special service district.

(5)  The legislative body of a county or municipality may not adopt a resolution or ordinance authorizing a special service district to provide a service if adequate protests are filed with respect to that service.



Amended by Chapter 265, 2013 General Session

